Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that public communications and notices to health plan members by carriers, health care providers, or health care facilities during contract negotiations have created concerns for enrollees, patients, and affected communities. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide consistent policies for communication with enrollees and affected communities regarding potential contract terminations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:(1) In the case of a provider contract that is expiring by its own terms or for which one party has given notice to the other party of an intended termination without cause in accordance with the terms of the provider contract, neither the health care provider, the health care facility, any health care provider employed by, contracted with, or otherwise affiliated with the facility, nor the carrier may make or cause to be made public statements, including by directly communicating with impacted health plan enrollees and patients, regarding such expiration or termination until 45 days prior to the termination date, unless: (a) The disclosure is required to satisfy a specific legal obligation; or (b) the expiration or termination has already been disclosed publicly because of a legal obligation. Communications exclusively with the governor, legislators, or state agency staff regarding a potential or intended contract termination do not constitute a public statement.(2) Nothing in this section requires a carrier, health care facility, or health care provider to provide notice of a potential termination to enrollees, unless required to do so as a regulatory or legal requirement.(3) Public statements or communication with health plan enrollees or patients by a carrier, health care facility, or health care provider may not occur prior to the date the carrier, health care facility, or health care provider has given written notice of the termination to the other party, unless agreed upon by both parties.(4)(a) By December 1, 2025, the commissioner, in consultation with health carriers, health care providers, health care facilities, and consumers, must develop standard template language for notices sent to health plan enrollees and patients by health carriers, health care providers, or health care facilities pursuant to this section. The standard template language must be posted on the commissioner's website.(b) Notices developed pursuant to this section must include, at a minimum:(i) A reference to the specific facility or facilities by name that would be affected by the potential contract termination or expiration and an indication of whether the potential termination or expiration would apply to hospital-based providers;(ii) Direction to enrollees related to appointments that are scheduled past the date of the potential contract termination or expiration date; and(iii) Information concerning the enrollee's continuity of care rights pursuant to the federal no surprises act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-111.(c) Notices sent to enrollees or patients that solely utilize the template language developed pursuant to this section are not subject to review or approval. Notices to enrollees or patients that do not utilize the template language in full, or add to or revise the language of the template developed pursuant to this section, must be reviewed and approved by the commissioner before being used in any manner.(5) By January 1, 2027, the requirements of this section must be included in all provider contracts. The commissioner must develop template language for inclusion in provider contracts by rule.(6)(a) The commissioner is authorized to enforce the provisions of this act related to carriers on or after January 1, 2026. In addition to the enforcement actions authorized under RCW 48.02.080, the commissioner may impose a civil monetary penalty in an amount not to exceed $100 for each day that a notice has been sent to enrollees in advance of the 45-day period established in subsection (1) of this section for each enrollee to whom the notice has been sent.(b) If the commissioner has cause to believe that any health care provider or health care facility has violated this section, the commissioner may submit information to the department of health, another appropriate health care facility licensing entity, or the appropriate health profession disciplining authority for action. The commissioner may provide the health care provider or health care facility with an opportunity to explain why the actions in question did not violate this section.(c) If any health care provider or health care facility violates this section, the department of health, other appropriate health care facility licensing entity, or the appropriate health profession disciplining authority may levy a fine or cost recovery upon the health care provider or health care facility in an amount not to exceed the applicable statutory amount per violation and take other action as permitted under the authority of the department of health or disciplining authority. Upon completion of its review of any potential violation submitted by the commissioner, the department of health or the disciplining authority shall notify the commissioner of the results of the review, including whether the violation was substantiated and any enforcement action taken as a result of a finding of a substantiated violation.(7) For the purposes of this section, "provider contract" means a written contract between a carrier and a health care provider or health care facility, as they are defined in RCW 48.43.005, for any health care services rendered to an enrollee.(8) This section does not apply to a provider contract that is expiring or being terminated by an independent individual provider or an independent single-specialty or multispecialty group practice of five or fewer providers, whether due to a provider's retirement or some other reason. For purposes of this subsection, "independent" means a provider that is not employed by or affiliated with a hospital or multihospital health system.Sec. 3. RCW 41.05.017 and 2024 c 251 s 5 and 2024 c 242 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, 48.43.440, section 2 of this act, and chapter 48.49 RCW.Sec. 4. RCW 18.130.180 and 2024 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:Except as provided in RCW 18.130.450, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder under the jurisdiction of this chapter:(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed;(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice any health care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing controlled substances for oneself;(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional conduct or practice;(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:(a) Not furnishing any papers, documents, records, or other items;(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the disciplining authority;(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with the disciplining authority;(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a license is required;(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or rule;(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving serious risk to public health;(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;(18) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon demand of the disciplining authority;(19) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as recognized by law;(20) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW or a pattern of violations of RCW 41.05.700(8), 48.43.735(8), 48.49.020, 48.49.030, 71.24.335(8), or 74.09.325(8);(21) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;(22) Current misuse of:(a) Alcohol;(b) Controlled substances; or(c) Legend drugs;(23) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client or patient;(24) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals, where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on recognized professional ethical standards;(25) Violation of RCW 18.130.420;(26) Performing conversion therapy on a patient under age eighteen;(27) Violation of RCW 18.130.430;(28) Violation of RCW 18.130.460; ((or))(29) Violation of section 2 of this act; or(30) Implanting the license holder's own gametes or reproductive material into a patient.Sec. 5. RCW 70.41.510 and 2019 c 427 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:If the insurance commissioner reports to the department that he or she has cause to believe that a hospital has engaged in a pattern of violations of RCW 48.49.020 or 48.49.030 or has violated section 2 of this act, and the report is substantiated after investigation, the department may levy a fine upon the hospital in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation and take other formal or informal disciplinary action as permitted under the authority of the department.Sec. 6. RCW 70.42.162 and 2019 c 427 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:If the insurance commissioner reports to the department that he or she has cause to believe that a medical ((testing [test]))test site has engaged in a pattern of violations of RCW 48.49.020 or 48.49.030 or has violated section 2 of this act, and the report is substantiated after investigation, the department may levy a fine upon the medical ((testing [test]))test site in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation and take other formal or informal disciplinary action as permitted under the authority of the department.Sec. 7. RCW 70.230.210 and 2019 c 427 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:If the insurance commissioner reports to the department that he or she has cause to believe that an ambulatory surgical facility has engaged in a pattern of violations of RCW 48.49.020 or 48.49.030 or has violated section 2 of this act, and the report is substantiated after investigation, the department may levy a fine upon the ambulatory surgical facility in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation and take other formal or informal disciplinary action as permitted under the authority of the department.Sec. 8. RCW 18.46.050 and 2024 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In any case in which the department finds that a birthing center has failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the standards or rules adopted under this chapter, section 2 of this act, or other applicable state or federal statutes or rules regulating birthing centers, the department may take one or more of the actions identified in this section, except as otherwise limited in this section.(a) When the department determines the birthing center has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been given any previous statement of deficiency that included the same or similar type of violation of the same or similar statute or rule, or when the birthing center failed to correct noncompliance with a statute or rule by a date established or agreed to by the department, the department may impose reasonable conditions on a license. Conditions may include correction within a specified amount of time, training, or hiring a department-approved consultant if the birthing center cannot demonstrate to the department that it has access to sufficient internal expertise. If the department determines that the violations constitute immediate jeopardy, the conditions may be imposed immediately in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.(b) In accordance with the authority the department has under RCW 43.70.095, the department may assess a civil fine of up to $3,000 per violation on a birthing center licensed under this chapter when the department determines the birthing center has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been given any previous statement of deficiency that included the same or similar type of violation of the same or similar statute or rule, or when the birthing center failed to correct noncompliance with a statute or rule by a date established or agreed to by the department.(i) Proceeds from these fines may only be used by the department to offset costs associated with licensing and enforcement of birthing centers.(ii) The department shall adopt in rules under this chapter specific fine amounts in relation to the severity of the noncompliance and at an adequate level to be a deterrent to future noncompliance.(iii) If a birthing center is aggrieved by the department's action of assessing civil fines, the licensee has the right to appeal under RCW 43.70.095.(c) The department may suspend a specific category or categories of services or care or birthing rooms within the birthing center as related to the violation by imposing a limited stop service. This may only be done if the department finds that noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy.(i) Prior to imposing a limited stop service, the department shall provide a birthing center written notification upon identifying deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. The birthing center shall have 24 hours from notification to develop and implement a department-approved plan to correct the deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. If the deficient practices or conditions that constitute immediate jeopardy are not verified by the department as having been corrected within the same 24-hour period, the department may issue the limited stop service.(ii) When the department imposes a limited stop service, the birthing center may not provide the services in the category or categories subject to the limited stop service to any new or existing patients, unless otherwise allowed by the department, until the limited stop service is terminated.(iii) The department shall conduct a follow-up inspection within five business days or within the time period requested by the birthing center if more than five business days is needed to verify the violation necessitating the limited stop service has been corrected.(iv) The limited stop service shall be terminated when:(A) The department verifies the violation necessitating the limited stop service has been corrected or the department determines that the birthing center has taken intermediate action to address the immediate jeopardy; and(B) The birthing center establishes the ability to maintain correction of the violation previously found deficient.(d) The department may suspend new admissions to the birthing center by imposing a stop placement. This may only be done if the department finds that noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy and is not confined to a specific category or categories of patients or a specific area of the birthing center.(i) Prior to imposing a stop placement, the department shall provide a birthing center written notification upon identifying deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. The birthing center shall have 24 hours from notification to develop and implement a department-approved plan to correct the deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. If the deficient practices or conditions that constitute immediate jeopardy are not verified by the department as having been corrected within the same 24-hour period, the department may issue the stop placement.(ii) When the department imposes a stop placement, the birthing center may not admit any new patients until the stop placement is terminated.(iii) The department shall conduct a follow-up inspection within five business days or within the time period requested by the birthing center if more than five business days is needed to verify the violation necessitating the stop placement has been corrected.(iv) The stop placement shall be terminated when:(A) The department verifies the violation necessitating the stop placement has been corrected or the department determines that the birthing center has taken intermediate action to address the immediate jeopardy; and(B) The birthing center establishes the ability to maintain correction of the violation previously found deficient.(e) The department may deny an application for a license or suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license.(2) Except as otherwise provided, RCW 43.70.115 governs notice of actions taken by the department under subsection (1) of this section and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding. Adjudicative proceedings and hearings under this section are governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The application for an adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the adverse action, include a copy of the department's notice, be served on and received by the department within 28 days of the birthing center's receipt of the adverse notice, and be served in a manner that shows proof of receipt.(3) When the department determines a licensee's noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy, the department may make the imposition of conditions on a licensee, a limited stop service, stop placement, or the suspension of a license effective immediately upon receipt of the notice by the licensee, pending any adjudicative proceeding.(a) When the department makes the suspension of a license or imposition of conditions on a license effective immediately, a licensee is entitled to a show cause hearing before a presiding officer within 14 days of making the request. The licensee must request the show cause hearing within 28 days of receipt of the notice of immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions. At the show cause hearing the department has the burden of demonstrating that more probably than not there is an immediate jeopardy.(b) At the show cause hearing, the presiding officer may consider the notice and documents supporting the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions and the licensee's response and shall provide the parties with an opportunity to provide documentary evidence and written testimony, and to be represented by counsel. Prior to the show cause hearing, the department shall provide the licensee with all documentation that supports the department's immediate suspension or imposition of conditions.(c) If the presiding officer determines there is no immediate jeopardy, the presiding officer may overturn the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions.(d) If the presiding officer determines there is immediate jeopardy, the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions shall remain in effect pending a full hearing.(e) If the presiding officer sustains the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions, the licensee may request an expedited full hearing on the merits of the department's action. A full hearing must be provided within 90 days of the licensee's request.(4) When the department determines an alleged violation, if true, would constitute an immediate jeopardy, and the licensee fails to cooperate with the department's investigation of such an alleged violation, the department may impose an immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension.(a) When the department imposes an immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension for failure to cooperate, a licensee is entitled to a show cause hearing before a presiding officer within 14 days of making the request. The licensee must request the show cause hearing within 28 days of receipt of the notice of an immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension for failure to cooperate. At the show cause hearing the department has the burden of demonstrating that more probably than not the alleged violation, if true, would constitute an immediate jeopardy and the licensee failed to cooperate with the department's investigation.(b) At the show cause hearing, the presiding officer may consider the notice and documents supporting the immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension for failure to cooperate, and the licensee's response and shall provide the parties with an opportunity to provide documentary evidence and written testimony, and to be represented by counsel. Prior to the show cause hearing, the department shall provide the licensee with all documentation that supports the department's immediate action for failure to cooperate.(c) If the presiding officer determines the alleged violation, if true, does not constitute an immediate jeopardy or determines that the licensee cooperated with the department's investigation, the presiding officer may overturn the immediate action for failure to cooperate.(d) If the presiding officer determines the allegation, if true, would constitute an immediate jeopardy and the licensee failed to cooperate with the department's investigation, the immediate action for failure to cooperate shall remain in effect pending a full hearing.(e) If the presiding officer sustains the immediate action for failure to cooperate, the licensee may request an expedited full hearing on the merits of the department's action. A full hearing must be provided within 90 days of the licensee's request.Sec. 9. RCW 70.127.170 and 2024 c 121 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:The department is authorized to take any of the actions identified in RCW 70.127.165 against an in-home services agency's license in any case in which it finds that the licensee:(1) Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, standards or rules adopted under this chapter, section 2 of this act, or other applicable state or federal statutes or rules regulating the facility or agency;(2) Was the holder of a license issued pursuant to this chapter that was revoked for cause and never reissued by the department, or that was suspended for cause and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled and the licensee has continued to operate;(3) Has knowingly or with reason to know made a misrepresentation of, false statement of, or failed to disclose, a material fact to the department in an application for the license or any data attached thereto or in any record required by this chapter or matter under investigation by the department, or during a survey, or concerning information requested by the department;(4) Refused to allow representatives of the department to inspect any book, record, or file required by this chapter to be maintained or any portion of the licensee's premises;(5) Willfully prevented, interfered with, or attempted to impede in any way the work of any representative of the department and the lawful enforcement of any provision of this chapter. This includes but is not limited to: Willful misrepresentation of facts during a survey, investigation, or administrative proceeding or any other legal action; or use of threats or harassment against any patient, client, or witness, or use of financial inducements to any patient, client, or witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence during a survey or investigation, in an administrative proceeding, or any other legal action involving the department;(6) Willfully prevented or interfered with any representative of the department in the preservation of evidence of any violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;(7) Failed to pay any civil monetary penalty assessed by the department pursuant to this chapter within 10 days after the assessment becomes final;(8) Used advertising that is false, fraudulent, or misleading;(9) Has repeated incidents of personnel performing services beyond their authorized scope of practice;(10) Misrepresented or was fraudulent in any aspect of the conduct of the licensee's business;(11) Within the last five years, has been found in a civil or criminal proceeding to have committed any act that reasonably relates to the person's fitness to establish, maintain, or administer an agency or to provide care in the home of another;(12) Was the holder of a license to provide care or treatment to ill individuals, vulnerable individuals, or individuals with disabilities that was denied, restricted, not renewed, surrendered, suspended, or revoked by a competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction. A certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement is conclusive evidence of the denial, restriction, nonrenewal, surrender, suspension, or revocation;(13) Failed to comply with an order issued by the secretary or designee;(14) Aided or abetted the unlicensed operation of an in-home services agency;(15) Operated beyond the scope of the in-home services agency license;(16) Failed to adequately supervise staff to the extent that the health or safety of a patient or client was at risk;(17) Compromised the health or safety of a patient or client, including, but not limited to, the individual performing services beyond their authorized scope of practice;(18) Continued to operate after license revocation, suspension, or expiration, or operating outside the parameters of a modified, conditioned, or restricted license;(19) Failed or refused to comply with chapter 70.02 RCW;(20) Abused, neglected, abandoned, or financially exploited a patient or client as these terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020;(21) Misappropriated the property of an individual;(22) Is unqualified or unable to operate or direct the operation of the agency according to this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter;(23) Obtained or attempted to obtain a license by fraudulent means or misrepresentation; or(24) Failed to report abuse or neglect of a patient or client in violation of chapter 74.34 RCW.Sec. 10. RCW 71.24.910 and 2022 c 263 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:If the insurance commissioner reports to the department that he or she has cause to believe that a provider licensed under this chapter has engaged in a pattern of violations of RCW 48.49.020 or 48.49.030 or has violated section 2 of this act, and the report is substantiated after investigation, the department may levy a fine upon the provider in an amount not to exceed $1,000 per violation and take other formal or informal disciplinary action as permitted under the authority of the department.Sec. 11. RCW 71.12.710 and 2024 c 121 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In any case in which the department finds that a private establishment has failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the standards or rules adopted under this chapter, section 2 of this act, or other applicable state or federal statutes or rules, the department may take one or more of the actions identified in this section, except as otherwise limited in this section.(a) When the department determines the private establishment has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been given any previous statement of deficiency that included the same or similar type of violation of the same or similar statute or rule, or when the private establishment failed to correct noncompliance with a statute or rule by a date established or agreed to by the department, the department may impose reasonable conditions on a license. Conditions may include correction within a specified amount of time, training, or hiring a department-approved consultant if the private establishment cannot demonstrate to the department that it has access to sufficient internal expertise.(b)(i) In accordance with the authority the department has under RCW 43.70.095, the department may assess a civil fine of up to $10,000 per violation, not to exceed a total fine of $1,000,000, on a private establishment licensed under this chapter when the department determines the private establishment has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule, or has been given any previous statement of deficiency that included the same or similar type of violation of the same or similar statute or rule, or when the private establishment failed to correct noncompliance with a statute or rule by a date established or agreed to by the department.(ii) Proceeds from these fines may only be used by the department to provide training or technical assistance to private establishments or to offset costs associated with licensing private establishments.(iii) The department shall adopt in rules under this chapter specific fine amounts in relation to the severity of the noncompliance.(iv) If a licensee is aggrieved by the department's action of assessing civil fines, the licensee has the right to appeal under RCW 43.70.095.(c) The department may suspend new admissions of a specific category or categories of patients as related to the violation by imposing a limited stop placement. This may only be done if the department finds that noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy.(i) Prior to imposing a limited stop placement, the department shall provide a private establishment written notification upon identifying deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy, and the private establishment shall have 24 hours from notification to develop and implement a department-approved plan to correct the deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. If the deficient practices or conditions that constitute immediate jeopardy are not verified by the department as having been corrected within the same 24-hour period, the department may issue the limited stop placement.(ii) When the department imposes a limited stop placement, the private establishment may not accept any new admissions in the category or categories subject to the limited stop placement until the limited stop placement order is terminated.(iii) The department shall conduct a follow-up inspection within five business days or within the time period requested by the private establishment if more than five business days is needed to verify the violation necessitating the limited stop placement has been corrected.(iv) The limited stop placement shall be terminated when:(A) The department verifies the violation necessitating the limited stop placement has been corrected or the department determines that the private establishment has taken intermediate action to address the immediate jeopardy; and(B) The private establishment establishes the ability to maintain correction of the violation previously found deficient.(d) The department may suspend all new admissions to the private establishment by imposing a stop placement. This may only be done if the department finds that noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy and is not confined to a specific category or categories of patients or a specific area of the private establishment.(i) Prior to imposing a stop placement, the department shall provide a private establishment written notification upon identifying deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy, and the private establishment shall have 24 hours from notification to develop and implement a department-approved plan to correct the deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. If the deficient practices or conditions that constitute immediate jeopardy are not verified by the department as having been corrected within the same 24-hour period, the department may issue the stop placement.(ii) When the department imposes a stop placement, the private establishment may not accept any new admissions until the stop placement order is terminated.(iii) The department shall conduct a follow-up inspection within five business days or within the time period requested by the private establishment if more than five business days is needed to verify the violation necessitating the stop placement has been corrected.(iv) The stop placement order shall be terminated when:(A) The department verifies the violation necessitating the stop placement has been corrected or the department determines that the private establishment has taken intermediate action to address the immediate jeopardy; and(B) The private establishment establishes the ability to maintain correction of the violation previously found deficient.(e) The department may suspend a specific category or categories of services within the private establishment as related to the violation by imposing a limited stop service. This may only be done if the department finds that noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy.(i) Prior to imposing a limited stop service, the department shall provide a private establishment written notification upon identifying deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. The private establishment shall have 24 hours from notification to develop and implement a department-approved plan to correct the deficient practices or conditions that constitute an immediate jeopardy. If the deficient practices or conditions that constitute immediate jeopardy are not verified by the department as having been corrected within the same 24-hour period, the department may issue the limited stop service.(ii) When the department imposes a limited stop service, the private establishment may not provide the services in the category or categories subject to the limited stop service to any new or existing individuals, unless otherwise allowed by the department, until the limited stop service is terminated.(iii) The department shall conduct a follow-up inspection within five business days or within the time period requested by the private establishment if more than five business days is needed to verify the violation necessitating the limited stop service has been corrected.(iv) The limited stop service shall be terminated when:(A) The department verifies the violation necessitating the limited stop service has been corrected or the department determines that the private establishment has taken intermediate action to address the immediate jeopardy; and(B) The private establishment establishes the ability to maintain correction of the violation previously found deficient.(f) The department may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license.(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided, RCW 43.70.115 governs notice of the imposition of conditions on a license, a limited stop placement, stop placement, limited stop service, or the suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew a license and provides the right to an adjudicative proceeding. Adjudicative proceedings and hearings under this section are governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The application for an adjudicative proceeding must be in writing, state the basis for contesting the adverse action, including a copy of the department's notice, be served on and received by the department within 28 days of the licensee's receipt of the adverse notice, and be served in a manner that shows proof of receipt.(b) When the department determines a licensee's noncompliance results in immediate jeopardy, the department may make the imposition of conditions on a licensee, a limited stop placement, stop placement, limited stop service, or the suspension of a license effective immediately upon receipt of the notice by the licensee, pending any adjudicative proceeding.(i) When the department makes the suspension of a license or imposition of conditions on a license effective immediately, a licensee is entitled to a show cause hearing before a presiding officer within 14 days of making the request. The licensee must request the show cause hearing within 28 days of receipt of the notice of immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions. At the show cause hearing the department has the burden of demonstrating that more probably than not there is an immediate jeopardy.(ii) At the show cause hearing, the presiding officer may consider the notice and documents supporting the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions and the licensee's response and must provide the parties with an opportunity to provide documentary evidence and written testimony, and to be represented by counsel. Prior to the show cause hearing, the department must provide the licensee with all documentation that supports the department's immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions.(iii) If the presiding officer determines there is no immediate jeopardy, the presiding officer may overturn the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions.(iv) If the presiding officer determines there is immediate jeopardy, the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions shall remain in effect pending a full hearing.(v) If the secretary sustains the immediate suspension or immediate imposition of conditions, the licensee may request an expedited full hearing on the merits of the department's action. A full hearing must be provided within 90 days of the licensee's request.(3) When the department determines an alleged violation, if true, would constitute an immediate jeopardy, and the licensee fails to cooperate with the department's investigation of such an alleged violation, the department may impose an immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension.(a) When the department imposes an immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension for failure to cooperate, a licensee is entitled to a show cause hearing before a presiding officer within 14 days of making the request. The licensee must request the show cause hearing within 28 days of receipt of the notice of an immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension for failure to cooperate. At the show cause hearing the department has the burden of demonstrating that more probably than not the alleged violation, if true, would constitute an immediate jeopardy and the licensee failed to cooperate with the department's investigation.(b) At the show cause hearing, the presiding officer may consider the notice and documents supporting the immediate stop placement, immediate limited stop placement, immediate limited stop service, immediate imposition of conditions, or immediate suspension for failure to cooperate, and the licensee's response and shall provide the parties with an opportunity to provide documentary evidence and written testimony, and to be represented by counsel. Prior to the show cause hearing, the department shall provide the licensee with all documentation that supports the department's immediate action for failure to cooperate.(c) If the presiding officer determines the alleged violation, if true, does not constitute an immediate jeopardy or determines that the licensee cooperated with the department's investigation, the presiding officer may overturn the immediate action for failure to cooperate.(d) If the presiding officer determines the allegation, if true, would constitute an immediate jeopardy and the licensee failed to cooperate with the department's investigation, the immediate action for failure to cooperate shall remain in effect pending a full hearing.(e) If the presiding officer sustains the immediate action for failure to cooperate, the licensee may request an expedited full hearing on the merits of the department's action. A full hearing must be provided within 90 days of the licensee's request.--- END ---